Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB748.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-661 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(a) 1. A health benefit plan[ issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2022,]
that provides coverage for treatment of a mental health condition shall
provide coverage of any treatment of a mental health condition under
terms or conditions that are no more restrictive than the terms or
conditions provided for treatment of a physical health condition.
2. Expenses for mental health and physical health conditions shall be
combined for purposes of meeting deductible and out-of-pocket limits
required under a health benefit plan.
3. A health benefit plan that does not otherwise provide for management of
care under the plan or that does not provide for the same degree of
management of care for all health or mental health conditions may
provide coverage for treatment of mental health conditions through a
managed care organization;
(b) With respect to mental health condition benefits in any classification of
benefits, a health benefit plan required to comply with paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall not impose:
1. A nonquantitative treatment limitation that does not apply to medical
and surgical benefits in the same classification; and
2. Medical necessity criteria or a nonquantitative treatment limitation
unless, under the terms of the plan, as written and in operation, any
processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors used in
applying the criteria or limitation to mental health condition benefits in
the classification are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
than, the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors
used in applying the criteria or limitation to medical and surgical
benefits in the same classification; and
(c) Paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be construed to require, at a minimum,
compliance with the requirements for nonquantitative treatment limitations set
forth in the Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, 42 U.S.C.
sec. 300gg-26, as amended, and any related federal regulations, as amended,
including but not limited to 45 C.F.R. secs. 146.136, 147.160, and
156.115(a)(3).
(2) (a) An insurer that issues or renews a health benefit plan that is subject to the
provisions of this section shall submit an annual report[ to the commissioner]
on or before April 1 of each year[ following January 1, 2022,] that contains
the following:
1. A description of the process used to develop or select the medical
necessity criteria for both mental health condition benefits and medical
and surgical benefits;
2. Identification of all nonquantitative treatment limitations applicable to
benefits and services covered under the plan that are applied to both
mental health condition benefits and medical and surgical benefits
within each classification of benefits;
3. The results of an analysis that demonstrates compliance with subsection
(1)(b) and (c) of this section for the medical necessity criteria described
in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph and for each nonquantitative
treatment limitation identified in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, as
written and in operation. At a minimum, the results of the analysis shall:
a. Identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative
treatment limitation will apply to a benefit, including factors that
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
were considered but rejected;
b. Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to
define the factors and any other evidence relied upon in designing
each nonquantitative treatment limitation;
c. Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the
analyses, performed to determine that the processes and strategies:
i. Used to design each nonquantitative treatment limitation, as
written, and the as-written processes and strategies used to
apply the nonquantitative treatment limitation to mental
health condition benefits are comparable to, and are applied
no more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to
design each nonquantitative treatment limitation, as written,
and the as-written processes and strategies used to apply the
nonquantitative treatment limitation to medical and surgical
benefits; and
ii. Used to apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation, in
operation, for mental health condition benefits are
comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the
processes and strategies used to apply each nonquantitative
treatment limitation, in operation, for medical and surgical
benefits; and
d. Disclose the specific findings and conclusions reached by the
insurer that the results of the analyses performed under this
subparagraph indicate that the insurer is in compliance with
subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section; and
4. Any additional information that may be prescribed by the commissioner
for use in determining compliance with the requirements of this section.
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
(b) Each[The] annual report shall be:
1. Submitted by the insurer, in a manner and format prescribed by the
commissioner through administrative regulation, to the commissioner
and the Legislative Research Commission for referral on or before
June 1 of each year to the Interim Joint Committees on Health
Services and Banking and Insurance and any other appropriate
committees; and
2. Published for public distribution by the commissioner on the
department's website.
(3) (a) A willful violation of this section shall constitute an act of discrimination and
shall be an unfair trade practice under this chapter.
(b) The remedies provided under Subtitle 12 of this chapter shall apply to conduct
in violation of this section.
(4) (a) Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection, the Attorney General may
enforce this section by bringing an action in the name of the
Commonwealth or on behalf of persons residing in the Commonwealth
against any person the Attorney General believes has violated, is violating,
or is likely to violate this section.
(b) The Attorney General:
1. May demand, and require the production of, any information,
documentary material, or evidence from any person the Attorney
General believes may have violated, may be violating, or may be likely
to violate this section; and
2. Shall have all of the powers and duties provided to the Attorney
General under KRS Chapter 15 to investigate and prosecute any
violation or likely violation of this section.
(c) 1. Prior to bringing an action under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
Attorney General shall provide each person thirty (30) days written
notice of the specific provisions of this section that the Attorney
General believes the person has violated, is violating, or is likely to
violate.
2. Except as provided in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, the Attorney
General shall not bring an action under paragraph (a) of this
subsection against a person if, within thirty (30) days of the date of the
notice provided under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the person:
a. Cures the noticed violation or violations or likely violation or
violations; and
b. Provides the Attorney General with an express written statement
that:
i. Any noticed violation or violations have been cured and
any noticed likely violation or violations will not occur; and
ii. No further violation or violations, including any likely
violation or violations, of this section by the person will
occur.
3. The Attorney General may bring an action under paragraph (a) of this
subsection against a person that:
a. Violates, or is likely to violate, this section following the cure
period provided to the person under this paragraph; or
b. Breaches an express written statement submitted by the person to
the Attorney General under subparagraph 2.b. of this paragraph.
(d) In any action brought under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Attorney
General may:
1. Obtain:
a. A declaratory judgment that one (1) or more alleged acts or
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
practices by a person or persons violate this section;
b. An injunction against any person that has violated, is violating,
or is likely to violate this section; and
c. Any other appropriate orders of the court to compel compliance
with this section; and
2. Recover:
a. Actual damages, which shall be paid to the injured person or
persons;
b. Any of the civil penalties set forth in KRS 367.990 for a violation
of KRS Chapter 367 for each violation and likely violation of this
section that occurs after the cure period provided under
paragraph (c) of this subsection;
c. Reasonable expenses incurred in investigating and preparing the
case;
d. Court costs;
e. Attorney's fees; and
f. Any other relief ordered by the court.
(5) (a) Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection, any person, including a health
facility or health professional, directly injured by a violation or likely
violation of this section may bring a private cause of action against the
person or persons alleged to have committed the violation or likely violation.
(b) An action brought under paragraph (a) of this subsection may be filed in
the:
1. Circuit Court of the county in which the injured person resides or
conducts business; or
2. Franklin Circuit Court.
(c) Prior to bringing an action under paragraph (a) of this subsection, an
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
injured person shall make reasonable efforts to provide to each person
alleged to be in violation or likely violation of this section notice:
1. Of the person's alleged violations and likely violations of this section;
and
2. That failure to cure any alleged violation or likely violation of this
section within fourteen (14) days of the date of the notice may result in
a civil action being filed against the person in a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(d) In any action brought under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the plaintiff
may:
1. Obtain:
a. A declaratory judgment that one (1) or more alleged acts or
practices by a person or persons violate this section;
b. An injunction against any person that has violated, is violating,
or is likely to violate this section; and
c. Any other appropriate orders of the court to compel compliance
with this section; and
2. Recover necessary costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees.
(6) Each occurrence of any the following shall constitute a separate violation of, and
direct injury under, this section that is subject to the remedies and penalties
available under this section:
(a) A person fails to comply with any requirement of this section;
(b) The denial of a claim under a health benefit plan as a result of a violation
under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) An insured seeks but is unable to obtain mental health condition benefits
under a health benefit plan as a result of a violation under paragraph (a) of
this subsection; and
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
(d) A health facility or health professional attempts but is unable to provide
mental health condition benefits under a health benefit plan as a result of a
violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(7) (a) The remedies and penalties set forth in this section shall be cumulative.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the powers,
duties, remedies, or penalties available to the commissioner, the Attorney
General, the Commonwealth, or any other person under any other statutory
or common law.
(c) No action taken pursuant to this section, or order of a court to enforce an
action taken pursuant to this section, shall in any way relieve or absolve any
affected person from any other liability, penalty, or forfeiture under law.
(8) The Attorney General may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A that are necessary to effectuate, or as an aid to the
effectuation of, the proper enforcement of this section.
Section 2. KRS 205.522 is amended to read as follows:
(1) With respect to the administration and provision of Medicaid benefits pursuant to
this chapter, the Department for Medicaid Services, any managed care organization
contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter, and the state's
medical assistance program shall be subject to, and comply with, the following, as
applicable:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) KRS 304.17A-145;
(c) KRS 304.17A-163;
(d) KRS 304.17A-1631;
(e) KRS 304.17A-167;
(f) KRS 304.17A-235;
(g) KRS 304.17A-257;
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
(h) KRS 304.17A-259;
(i) KRS 304.17A-263;
(j) KRS 304.17A-264;
(k) KRS 304.17A-515;
(l) KRS 304.17A-580;
(m) KRS 304.17A-600, 304.17A-603, and 304.17A-607;[ and]
(n) KRS 304.17A-740 to 304.17A-743; and
(o) Section 1 of this Act.
(2) A managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to
this chapter shall comply with the reporting requirements of KRS 304.17A-732.
Section 3. If the Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form
of authorization or approval from any federal agency is necessary prior to implementation
of Section 2 of this Act for any reason, including the loss of federal funds, the department
or cabinet shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request any
necessary state plan amendment, waiver, authorization, or approval, and may only delay
full implementation of those provisions for which a state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval was deemed necessary until the state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval is granted or approved.
Section 4. The Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services shall, in accordance with KRS 205.525, provide a copy of any state plan
amendment, waiver application, or other request for authorization or approval submitted
pursuant to Section 3 of this Act to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committees on Health Services and Appropriations and Revenue and
shall provide an update on the status of any application or request submitted pursuant to
Section 3 of this Act at the request of the Legislative Research Commission or any
committee thereof.
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1792
Section 5. Whereas parity in the provision of mental health condition benefits is
imperative to the health and well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:46 PM Jacketed